Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
50-114.05
Clerk of
the Legislature Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The
Clerk of the Legislature Cash Fund is hereby created. The fund shall consist
of funds received by the Clerk of the Legislature pursuant to sections 49-1480.01
and 49-1482. The fund shall be used by the Clerk of the Legislature to perform
the duties required by sections 49-1480 to 49-1492.01, except that transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in
the Clerk of the Legislature Cash Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.

Laws 1994, LB 872, § 14;

Laws 1994, LB 1243, § 16;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 53;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 67;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 26.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.